Rhode Island statutes. Title 19 Financial Institutions
Chapter 14 Licensed Activities

19-14-1.
Definitions.

Unless otherwise specified, the following terms shall have the following meanings throughout chapters 14, 14.1, 14.2, 14.3, 14.4, 14.6, 14.8, 14.10, and 14.11 of this title:

“Bona fide employee” shall mean an employee of a licensee who works under the oversight and supervision of the licensee.

“Check” means any check, draft, money order, personal money order, or other instrument for the transmission or payment of money. For the purposes of check cashing, travelers checks or foreign denomination instruments shall not be considered checks. “Check cashing” means providing currency for checks.

“Check casher” means a person or entity who or that, for compensation, engages, in whole or in part, in the business of cashing checks.

“Currency transmission” means engaging in the business of any of the following:

Sale or issuance of payment instruments or stored value primarily for personal, family, or household purposes; or

Receiving money or monetary value for transmission or holding funds incidental to transmission within the United States or to locations abroad by any and all means, including payment instrument, stored value, wire, facsimile, or electronic transfer, primarily for personal, family, or household purposes. This includes maintaining control of virtual currency or transactions in virtual currency on behalf of others.

“Deferred-deposit transaction” means any transaction, such as those commonly known as “payday loans,” “payday advances,” or “deferred-presentment loans,” in which a cash advance is made to a customer in exchange for the customer’s personal check or in exchange for the customer’s authorization to debit the customer’s deposit account and where the parties agree either that the check will not be cashed or deposited, or that the customer’s deposit account will not be debited until a designated future date.

[Deleted by P.L. 2019, ch. 226, § 1 and P.L. 2019, ch. 246, § 1.]

“Deliver” means to deliver a check to the first person who, in payment for the check, makes, or purports to make, a remittance of, or against, the face amount of the check, whether or not the deliverer also charges a fee in addition to the face amount and whether or not the deliverer signs the check.

“Insurance premium finance agreement” means an agreement by which an insured, or prospective insured, promises to pay to an insurance premium finance company the amount advanced, or to be advanced, under the agreement to an insurer or to an insurance producer, in payment of a premium, or premiums, on an insurance contract, or contracts, together with interest and a service charge, as authorized and limited by this title.

“Insurance premium finance company” means a person or entity engaged in the business of making insurance premium finance agreements or acquiring insurance premium finance agreements from other insurance premium finance companies.

“Lender” means any person who makes or funds a loan within this state with the person’s own funds, regardless of whether the person is the nominal mortgagee or creditor on the instrument evidencing the loan;

A loan is made or funded within this state if any of the following conditions exist:

The loan is secured by real property located in this state;

An application for a loan is taken by an employee, agent, or representative of the lender within this state;

The loan closes within this state;

A retail installment contract as defined herein is created;

The loan solicitation is done by an individual with a physical presence in this state; or

The lender maintains an office in this state;

The term “lender” shall also include any person engaged in a transaction whereby the person makes or funds a loan within this state using the proceeds of an advance under a line of credit over which proceeds the person has dominion and control and for the repayment of which the person is unconditionally liable. This transaction is not a table-funding transaction. A person is deemed to have dominion and control over the proceeds of an advance under a line of credit used to fund a loan regardless of whether:

The person may, contemporaneously with, or shortly following, the funding of the loan, assign or deliver to the line of credit lender one or more loans funded by the proceeds of an advance to the person under the line of credit;

The proceeds of an advance are delivered directly to the settlement agent by the line-of-credit lender, unless the settlement agent is the agent of the line-of-credit lender;

One or more loans funded by the proceeds of an advance under the line of credit is purchased by the line-of-credit lender; or

Under the circumstances, as set forth in regulations adopted by the director, or the director’s designee, pursuant to this chapter.

“Licensee” means any person licensed under this chapter.

“Loan” means any advance of money or credit including, but not limited to:

Loans secured by mortgages;

Insurance premium finance agreements;

The purchase or acquisition of retail installment contracts or advances to the holders of those contracts;

Educational loans;

Any other advance of money; or

Any transaction, such as those commonly known as “payday loans,” “payday advances,” or “deferred-presentment loans,” in which a cash advance is made to a customer in exchange for the customer’s personal check, or in exchange for the customer’s authorization to debit the customer’s deposit account, and where the parties agree either, that the check will not be cashed or deposited, or that customer’s deposit account will not be debited, until a designated future date.

“Loan broker” means any person or entity who or that, for compensation or gain, or in the expectation of compensation or gain, either directly or indirectly, solicits, processes, negotiates, places, or sells a loan within this state for others in the primary market, or offers to do so. A loan broker shall also mean any person who is the nominal mortgagee or creditor in a table-funding transaction. A loan is brokered within this state if any of the following conditions exist:

The loan is secured by real property located in this state;

An application for a loan is taken or received by an employee, agent, or representative of the loan broker within this state;

The loan closes within this state;

The loan solicitation is done by an individual with a physical presence in this state; or

The loan broker maintains an office in this state.

“Loan-closing services” means providing title services, including title searches, title examinations, abstract preparation, insurability determinations, and the issuance of title commitments and title insurance policies, conducting loan closings, and preparation of loan-closing documents when performed by, or under the supervision of, a licensed attorney, licensed title agency, or licensed title insurance company.

“Loan solicitation” shall mean an effectuation, procurement, delivery and offer, or advertisement of a loan. Loan solicitation also includes providing or accepting loan applications and assisting persons in completing loan applications and/or advising, conferring, or informing anyone regarding the benefits, terms and/or conditions of a loan product or service. Loan solicitation does not include loan processing or loan underwriting as defined in this section. Loan solicitation does not include telemarketing that is defined, for purposes of this section, to mean contacting a person by telephone with the intention of collecting such person’s name, address, and telephone number for the sole purpose of allowing a mortgage loan originator to fulfill a loan inquiry.

“Loan underwriting” shall mean a loan process that involves the analysis of risk with respect to the decision whether to make a loan to a loan applicant based on credit, employment, assets, and other factors, including evaluating a loan applicant against a lender’s various lending criteria for creditworthiness, making a determination for the lender as to whether the applicant meets the lender’s pre-established credit standards, and/or making a recommendation regarding loan approval.

“Monetary value” means a medium of exchange, whether or not redeemable in fiat currency.

“Mortgage loan” means a loan secured in whole, or in part, by real property located in this state.

“Mortgage loan originator” has the same meaning set forth in §

19-14.10-3(6)

.

“Nationwide Multistate Licensing System” means a system involving more than one state, the District of Columbia, or the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico and that is established to facilitate the sharing of regulatory information and the licensing, application, reporting, and payment processes, by electronic or other means, for mortgage lenders and loan brokers and other licensees required to be licensed under this chapter.

“Natural person employee” shall mean any natural person performing services as a bona fide employee for a person or entity licensed under §

19-14-1

et seq., in return for a salary, wage, or other consideration, where such salary, wage, or consideration is reported by the licensee on a federal form W-2 payroll record. The term does not include any natural person or business entity performing services for a person licensed under the provisions of Rhode Island general laws in return for a salary, wage, or other consideration, where such salary, wage, or consideration is reported by the licensee on a federal form 1099.

“Negative equity” means the difference between the value of an asset and the outstanding portion of the loan taken out to pay for the asset, when the latter exceeds the former amount.

“Negotiates” shall mean, with respect to a loan, to confer directly with, or offer advice directly to, a loan applicant or prospective loan applicant for a loan product or service concerning any of the substantive benefits, terms, or conditions of the loan product or service.

“Nonprofit organization” means a corporation qualifying as a 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3) nonprofit organization, in the operation of which no member, director, officer, partner, employee, agent, or other affiliated person profits financially other than receiving reasonable salaries if applicable.

“Operating subsidiary” shall mean a majority-owned subsidiary of a financial institution or banking institution that engages only in activities permitted by the parent financial institution or banking institution.

“Oversight and supervision of the licensee” shall mean that the licensee provides training to the employee, sets the employee’s hours of work, provides the employee with the equipment required to perform the employee’s duties, and supervises the services provided by the employee to the licensee.

“Personal money order” means any instrument for the transmission or payment of money in relation to which the purchaser or remitter appoints, or purports to appoint, the seller as his or her agent for the receipt, transmission, or handling of money, whether the instrument is signed by the seller, or by the purchaser, or remitter, or some other person.

“Primary market” means the market in which loans are made to borrowers by lenders, whether or not through a loan broker or other conduit.

“Principal owner” means any person or entity who or that owns, controls, votes, or has a beneficial interest in, directly or indirectly, ten percent (10%) or more of the outstanding capital stock and/or equity interest of a licensee.

“Processes” shall mean, with respect to a loan, any of a series of acts or functions, including the preparation of a loan application and supporting documents, performed by a person that leads to, or results in, the acceptance, approval, denial, and/or withdrawal of a loan application, including, without limitation, the rendering of services, including loan underwriting, obtaining verifications, credit reports or appraisals, communicating with the applicant and/or the lender or loan broker, and/or other loan processing and origination services, for consideration by a lender or loan broker. Loan processing does not include the following:

Providing loan closing services;

Rendering of credit reports by an authorized credit reporting agency; and

Rendering of appraisal services.

“Provisional employee” means a natural person who, pursuant to a written agreement between the natural person and a wholly owned subsidiary of a financial holding company, as defined in the Bank Holding Company Act of 1956 (12 U.S.C. § 1841 et seq.), as amended, a bank-holding company, savings-bank-holding company, or thrift-holding company, is an exclusive agent for the subsidiary with respect to mortgage loan originations and the subsidiary: (a) Holds a valid loan broker’s license; and (b) Enters into a written agreement with the director, or the director’s designee, to include:

An “undertaking of accountability,” in a form prescribed by the director, or the director’s designee, for all of the subsidiary’s exclusive agents to include full-and-direct financial and regulatory responsibility for the mortgage loan originator activities of each exclusive agent as if said exclusive agent were an employee of the subsidiary;

A business plan, to be approved by the director, or the director’s designee, for the education of the exclusive agents, the handling of consumer complaints related to the exclusive agents, and the supervision of the mortgage loan origination activities of the exclusive agents; and

A restriction of the exclusive agents’ mortgage loan originators’ activities to loans to be made only by the subsidiary’s affiliated bank.

“Remote location” means a location meeting the requirements of §

19-14-25(b)

at which an employee of a licensee may provide services for the licensee notwithstanding that the location differs from the place of business named in the license or a branch certificate issued to the licensee.

“Retail installment contract” means any security agreement negotiated or executed in this state, or under the laws of this state, including, but not limited to, any agreement in the nature of a mortgage, conditional sale contract, or any other agreement whether or not evidenced by any written instrument to pay the retail purchase price of goods, or any part thereof, in installments over any period of time and pursuant to which any security interest is retained or taken by the retail seller for the payment of the purchase price, or any part thereof, of the retail installment contract.

“Sell” means to sell, to issue, or to deliver a check.

“Servicing” means receiving a scheduled, periodic payment from a borrower, pursuant to the terms of a loan, including amounts for escrow accounts, and making the payments to the owner of the loan or other third party of principal and interest and other payments with respect to the amounts received from the borrower as may be required pursuant to the terms of the servicing loan documents or servicing contract. In the case of a home equity conversion mortgage or a reverse mortgage, servicing includes making payment to the borrower.

“Simple interest” means interest computed on the principal balance outstanding immediately prior to a payment for one plus the actual number of days between payments made on a loan over the life of a loan.

“Small loan” means a loan of less than five thousand dollars ($5,000), not secured by real estate, made pursuant to the provisions of chapter 14.2 of this title.

“Small-loan lender” means a lender engaged in the business of making small loans within this state.

“Stored value” means monetary value representing a claim against the issuer that is stored on an electronic or digital medium and is evidenced by an electronic or digital record, and that is intended and accepted for use as a means of redemption for money or monetary value or payment for goods or services. The term does not include stored value that is redeemable by the issuer exclusively in goods or services; stored value that is redeemable exclusively in goods or services limited to transactions involving a defined merchant or location or set of locations, such as a specific retailer or retail chain, college campus, or program points, miles, or other units issued in connection with a customer affinity or rewards program, even if there is a secondary market for the stored value.

“Table-funding transaction” means a transaction in which there is a contemporaneous advance of funds by a lender and an assignment by the mortgagee or creditor of the loan to the lender.

“Third-party loan servicer” means a person or entity who or that, directly or indirectly, engages in the business of servicing a loan secured by residential real estate located in Rhode Island, for a personal, family, or household purpose, owed or due, or asserted to be owed or due, another, or a person or entity that owns the servicing rights to a loan secured by residential real estate located in Rhode Island whether or not that owner services the loan themselves or contracts with another person or entity for the servicing.

“Virtual currency”:

Means a digital representation of value that:

Is used as a medium of exchange, unit of account, or store of value; and

Is not legal tender, whether or not denominated in legal tender; and

Does not include:

A transaction in which a merchant grants, as part of an affinity or rewards program, value that cannot be taken from or exchanged with the merchant for legal tender, bank credit, or virtual currency;

A digital representation of value issued by or on behalf of a publisher and used solely within an online game, game platform, or family of games sold by the same publisher or offered on the same game platform;

Native digital token used in a proprietary blockchain service platform; or

A gift certificate; store gift card; general-use prepaid card; or loyalty, award, or promotional gift card, as these terms are defined in federal Regulation E, 12 C.F.R. § 1005.20(a), without giving effect to any exception as specified in 31 C.F.R. § 1010.100(kkk) or any card, code or device, or other device that can add funds to those products.

“Writing” means hard-copy writing or electronic writing that meets the requirements of §

42-127.1-2(7)

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 52; P.L. 1997, ch. 98, § 9; P.L. 2000, ch. 147, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 116, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 129, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 371, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 241, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 79, § 2; P.L. 2003, ch. 82, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 579, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 243, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 291, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 16, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 244, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 251, § 2; P.L. 2008, ch. 261, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 452, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 148, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 160, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 56, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 64, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 239, § 2; P.L. 2014, ch. 106, § 3; P.L. 2014, ch. 125, § 3; P.L. 2014, ch. 487, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 522, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 82, § 10; P.L. 2015, ch. 105, § 10; P.L. 2015, ch. 250, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 268, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 512, art. 1, § 6; P.L. 2019, ch. 226, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 246, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 338, § 3, effective June 29, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 339, § 3, effective June 29, 2022.

19-14-2.
Licenses required.

No person shall engage within this state in the business of: (1) Making or funding loans or acting as a lender or small loan lender; (2) Brokering loans or acting as a loan broker; (3) Providing currency transmission for a fee or other consideration; (4) Cashing checks for a fee or other consideration, which includes any premium charged for the sale of goods in excess of the cash price of the goods; (5) Providing debt-management services; (6) Performing the duties of a mortgage-loan originator; (7) Servicing a loan, directly or indirectly, as a third-party loan servicer without first obtaining a license or registration from the director or the director’s designee. The licensing requirement for any person providing debt-management plans shall apply to all persons, without regard for state of incorporation or a physical presence in this state, who initiate or service debt-management plans for residents of this state. Special exemptions from licensing for each activity are contained in other chapters in this title.

No lender or loan-broker licensee shall permit an employee to act as a mortgage loan originator without first verifying that the originator is licensed under this chapter. No individual may act as a mortgage-loan originator without being licensed, or act as a mortgage-loan originator for more than one person. The license of a mortgage-loan originator is not effective during any period when the mortgage-loan originator is not associated with a lender or loan-broker licensee.

Each loan negotiated, solicited, placed, found, or made without a license as required in subsection (a) shall constitute a separate violation for purposes of this chapter.

No person engaged in the business of making or brokering loans in this state, whether licensed in accordance with the provisions of this chapter or exempt from licensing, shall accept applications, or referral of applicants from, or pay a fee to, any lender, loan broker, or mortgage-loan originator who is required to be licensed or registered under said sections but is not licensed to act as such by the director, or the director’s designee.

No person, except those exempt pursuant to §

19-14.3-1

, shall engage in the business of currency transmission in this state without a license as provided in this chapter.

A currency transmission licensee may conduct its business in this state at one or more locations, directly or indirectly owned, or through one or more authorized delegates, or both, pursuant to the license granted under this chapter.

A person is considered to be engaged in the business of currency transmission in this state if that person enters into a transaction with a person physically located in or resident in Rhode Island at the time the transaction is initiated.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 52; P.L. 2000, ch. 147, § 2; P.L. 2003, ch. 163, § 2; P.L. 2003, ch. 169, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 579, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 243, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 291, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 16, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 244, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 487, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 522, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 226, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 246, § 1.

19-14-3.
Application for license.

The application for a license shall be in the form prescribed by the director and shall contain the name and address or addresses where the business of the applicant is located and if the applicant is a partnership, association, corporation, or other form of business organization, the names and addresses of each member, director, and principal officer thereof or any individual acting in the capacity of the manager of an office location. The application shall also include a description of the activities of the applicant, in such detail and for such periods as the director may require, as well as such further information as the director may require. The director may require a background investigation of each applicant for a license by means of fingerprint checks pursuant to §§

19-14-7

and

42-14-14

, utilizing the Federal Bureau of Investigation, or other agency as determined by the director for state and national criminal history record checks. If the applicant is a partnership, association, corporation, or other form of business organization, the director may require a background investigation by means of fingerprint checks on each member, director, trustee, or principal officer of the applicant and any individual acting in the capacity of the manager of an office location. The director will determine by rule those items of information appearing on a criminal records check that will constitute disqualifying information and therefore render the applicant ineligible for licensing under this chapter in accordance with the provisions of §

19-14-7

. Each application for a license shall be accompanied by an investigation fee. The applicant at the time of making application shall pay to the department a fee equal to the annual license fee as provided in this chapter and the sum of one half (1/2) of the annual license fee as a fee for investigating the application. The license shall be continuous and the license fee shall cover the period through December 31 of each year. The annual license fee for any application approved after November 1 of any given year shall satisfy the annual license fee requirement through the end of the next succeeding calendar year ending December 31. The director, or the director’s designee, is authorized to participate in a multistate licensing system for licensees. The director may establish requirements for participation by an applicant for a license or a person licensed under this chapter. Any such requirements that may be established by the director shall be published on the website of the department of business regulation. Upon implementation, participation by an applicant for a license or by a person licensed under the provisions of this chapter shall be mandatory. The applicant may be required to an additional fee for a license or other participation in such multistate licensing system.

[Reserved].

[Reserved].

Any license issued under the provisions of former § 5-66-2 shall remain in full force and effect until its expiration and shall be subject to the provisions of this chapter.

An applicant for issuance of a mortgage loan originator license shall file with the director, or the director’s designee, evidence acceptable to the director, or the director’s designee, that said applicant has complied with the provisions of §§

19-14.10-5

,

19-14.10-7

and

19-14.10-8

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 52; P.L. 2004, ch. 579, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 243, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 291, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 16, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 244, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 251, § 2; P.L. 2009, ch. 148, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 160, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 56, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 64, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 338, § 3, effective June 29, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 339, § 3, effective June 29, 2022.

19-14-4.
Annual fee.

Each licensee shall pay an annual license fee as follows:

Each small-loan lender license and each branch certificate, the sum of five hundred fifty dollars ($550);

Each loan-broker license and each branch certificate, the sum of five hundred fifty dollars ($550);

Each lender license and each branch certificate, the sum of one thousand one hundred dollars ($1,100);

Each currency transmission license, the sum of one thousand dollars ($1,000);

Each check cashing license, the sum of three hundred sixty dollars ($360);

[Deleted by P.L. 2019, ch. 226, § 1 and P.L. 2019, ch. 246, § 1.]

Each registration to provide debt-management services, the sum of two hundred dollars ($200);

Each mortgage-loan originator license, the sum of four hundred dollars ($400); and

Each third-party loan-servicer license and each branch certificate, the sum of one thousand one hundred dollars ($1,100).

Any licensee who shall not pay the annual fee by December 31 of each year shall be subject to a daily penalty of twenty-five dollars ($25) per day, subject to a maximum of seven hundred fifty dollars ($750). The penalty shall be paid to the director to, and for the use of, the state. The penalty may be waived for good cause by the director, or the director’s designee, upon written request.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 52; P.L. 2002, ch. 65, art. 13, § 19; P.L. 2004, ch. 579, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 243, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 291, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 16, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 244, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 251, § 2; P.L. 2009, ch. 68, art. 12, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 487, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 522, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 5, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 226, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 246, § 1.

19-14-5.
Minimum capital.

Each licensee, licensed pursuant to an application for license filed after June 30, 1995, shall maintain the following minimum-net worth to be evidenced in accordance with regulations promulgated by the director, or the director’s designee.

Small-loan lenders, the sum of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000);

Loan brokers, the sum of ten thousand dollars ($10,000);

Lenders, the sum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000);

Currency transmission licensees, the sum of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000). If a licensee limits its actions to virtual currency, the licensee may include in its calculation of net worth virtual currency, measured by the average value of the virtual currency in U.S. Dollar equivalent over the prior six (6) months; and

Third-party loan servicers, the sum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 52; P.L. 2014, ch. 487, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 522, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 226, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 246, § 1.

19-14-6.
Bond of applicant.

An applicant for any license shall file with the director, or the director’s designee, a bond to be approved by him or her in which the applicant shall be the obligor.

The amount of the bond shall be as follows:

Small-loan lenders, the sum of ten thousand dollars ($10,000);

Loan brokers, the sum of twenty thousand dollars ($20,000);

Lenders, the sum of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000);

Currency transmission licensees, the sum of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000). If a currency transmission licensee shows that a surety bond is not generally available in this state at a commercially reasonable cost, the department may accept an alternative form of security;

Check-cashing licensees who accept checks for collection with deferred payment or deferred deposit, the sum of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) subject to a maximum of one hundred and fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) when aggregated with agent locations;

[Deleted by P.L. 2019, ch. 226, § 1 and P.L. 2019, ch. 246, § 1.]

[Deleted by P.L. 2019, ch. 226, § 1 and P.L. 2019, ch. 246, § 1.]

Each debt-management services registrant, the amount provided in §

19-14.8-13

;

Each third-party loan servicer, the sum of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000); or

Each debt collector, the sum of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).

The bond shall run to the state for the use of the state and of any person who may have cause of action against the obligor of the bond under the provisions of this title. The bond shall be perpetual and shall be conditioned upon the obligor faithfully conforming to, and abiding by, the provisions of this title and of all rules and regulations lawfully made, and the obligor will pay to the state and to any person any and all money that may become due or owing to the state or to the person from the obligor under, and by virtue of, the provisions of this title.

[Deleted by P.L. 2019, ch. 226, § 1 and P.L. 2019, ch. 246, § 1.]

The bond shall remain in force and effect until the surety is released from liability by the director, or the director’s designee, or until the bond is cancelled by the surety. The surety may cancel the bond and be released from further liability under the bond upon receipt by the director, or the director’s designee, of notice in a manner satisfactory to the director, including, but not limited to, for documentation purpose of the cancellation of the bond at least thirty (30) days in advance of the cancellation of the bond. The cancellation shall not affect any liability incurred or accrued under the bond before the termination of the thirty-day (30) period.

Upon receipt of any notice of cancellation, the director may provide notice to the licensee requiring reinstatement or replacement of the bond. Unless the bond is reinstated by the surety, or a satisfactory replacement bond is filed with the director prior to the cancellation of the original bond, the license shall be suspended. The licensee will be provided notice of the suspension and may request a hearing within thirty (30) days. If the licensee does not request a hearing, the director, or director’s designee, shall issue an order revoking the license for failure to comply with this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 52; P.L. 2001, ch. 129, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 171, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 579, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 243, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 291, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 16, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 244, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 106, § 3; P.L. 2014, ch. 125, § 3; P.L. 2014, ch. 487, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 522, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 226, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 246, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 338, § 3, effective June 29, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 339, § 3, effective June 29, 2022.

19-14-7.
Issuance or denial of license.

Upon the filing of a completed application, the payment of fees and the approval of the bond, the director, or the director’s designee, shall commence an investigation of the applicant.

After the investigation determines that a completed application has been filed, the director, or the director’s designee, shall approve the license applied for in accordance with the provisions of this chapter if he or she shall find:

That the financial responsibility, experience, character, and general fitness of the applicant, and of the applicant’s members and of the applicant’s officers, including the designated manager of record of a licensed location, if the applicant is a partnership, limited liability company or association, or of the officers including the designated manager of record of a licensed location, and directors and the principal owner or owners of the issued and outstanding capital stock, if the applicant is a corporation, are such as to command the confidence of the community and to warrant belief that the business will be operated honestly, fairly, and efficiently within the purposes of this title.

A license provided pursuant to this title shall remain in full force and effect until it is surrendered by the licensee or revoked or suspended as provided by law. The licensee is, however, subject to suspension or revocation for failure to comply with any applicable provision of this title or regulation promulgated thereunder.

If the director, or the director’s designee, rejects an application for a license, he or she shall notify the applicant, in writing, and advise the applicant of the reason for the denial of the application for license. When an application for a license is denied by the director, or the director’s designee, or withdrawn by the applicant, the director, or the director’s designee, shall return to the applicant the bond, but shall retain the investigation fee to cover the costs of investigating the application. The applicant may make written demand for hearing upon the director, or director’s designee, within thirty (30) days of the notice to determine the reasonableness of the action to deny the license.

Any applicant or licensee aggrieved by the action of the director, or the director’s designee, in denying a completed application for a license shall have the right to appeal the action, order, or decision pursuant to chapter 35 of title 42.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 52; P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 16, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 244, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 148, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 160, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 65, § 2; P.L. 2012, ch. 145, § 2; P.L. 2014, ch. 106, § 3; P.L. 2014, ch. 125, § 3.

19-14-8.
Denial of license due to incomplete application.

If the applicant has failed to provide the information requested by the department to complete the application, the director, or the director’s designee, shall notify the applicant, in writing, that the application shall be considered withdrawn if all information requested is not received within thirty (30) days of the notice. The notice shall specify what information is necessary for completion. The applicant may make a written demand within thirty (30) days for a hearing to determine the reasonableness of the director’s, or the director’s designee’s, action. The hearing shall be conducted pursuant to the Administrative Procedures Act, chapter 35 of title 42. If the applicant fails to provide the information or request a hearing within thirty (30) days from the notice, the application shall be withdrawn on the basis that it is incomplete.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 52; P.L. 2012, ch. 65, § 2; P.L. 2012, ch. 145, § 2; P.L. 2014, ch. 106, § 3; P.L. 2014, ch. 125, § 3.

19-14-9.
Contents of license.

The license or branch certificate shall contain any information that the director, or the director’s designee, shall require, including the type of activity authorized. In his or her discretion, the director, or the director’s designee, may substitute an electronic record as the confirmation of a license status in substitution for a license or branch certificate. When dealing with an applicant, or potential applicant, for a mortgage loan or when dealing with any person providing settlement services (as defined in the Real Estate Settlement Procedures Act, as amended, 12 U.S.C. § 2601 et seq., or the regulations promulgated thereunder from time to time), a mortgage loan originator shall disclose the mortgage loan originator’s nationwide mortgage licensing system unique identification number upon request to the applicant, or potential applicant, and the fact that the mortgage loan originator is licensed by this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 52; P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 16, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 244, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 148, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 160, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 106, § 3; P.L. 2014, ch. 125, § 3; P.L. 2016, ch. 512, art. 1, § 6.